Missouri, session 2026, HB2807.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 260.035, 393.1025, 393.1030, and 393.1050, RSMo, are repealed
and four new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 260.035, 393.1025,
393.1030, and 393.1050, to read as follows:
260.035. 1. The authority is hereby granted and may exercise all powers necessary or
appropriate to carry out and effectuate its purposes pursuant to the provisions of sections
260.005 to 260.125, including, but not limited to, the following:
(1) To adopt bylaws and rules after having held public hearings thereon for the
regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business;
(2) To adopt an official seal;
(3) To maintain a principal office and such other offices within the state as it may
designate;
(4) To sue and be sued;
(5) To make and execute leases, contracts, releases, compromises, and other
instruments necessary or convenient for the exercise of its powers or to carry out its purposes;
(6) To acquire, construct, reconstruct, enlarge, improve, furnish, equip, maintain,
repair, operate, lease, finance, and sell equipment, structures, systems, and projects and to
lease the same to any private person, firm, or corporation, or to any public body, political
subdivision, or municipal corporation. Any such lease may provide for the construction of
the project by the lessee;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2807 2
(7) To issue bonds and notes as hereinafter provided and to make, purchase, or
participate in the purchase of loans or municipal obligations and to guarantee loans to finance
the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, enlargement, improvement, furnishing,
equipping, maintaining, repairing, operating, or leasing of a project;
(8) To invest any funds not required for immediate disbursement in obligations of the
state of Missouri or of the United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or in bank
certificates of deposit; provided, however, the foregoing limitations on investments shall not
apply to proceeds acquired from the sale of bonds or notes which are held by a corporate
trustee pursuant to section 260.060;
(9) To acquire by gift or purchase, hold and dispose of real and personal property in
the exercise of its powers and the performance of its duties hereunder;
(10) To employ managers and other employees and retain or contract with architects,
engineers, accountants, financial consultants, attorneys, and such other persons, firms, or
corporations who are necessary in its judgment to carry out its duties, and to fix the
compensation thereof;
(11) To receive and accept appropriations, bequests, gifts, and grants and to utilize or
dispose of the same to carry out its purposes pursuant to the provisions of sections 260.005 to
260.125;
(12) To engage in research and development with respect to pollution control
facilities and solid waste or sewage disposal facilities, water facilities, resource recovery
facilities, and the development of energy resources;
(13) To collect rentals, fees, and other charges in connection with its services or for
the use of any project hereunder;
(14) To sell at private sale any of its property or projects to any private person, firm,
or corporation, or to any public body, political subdivision, or municipal corporation, on such
terms as it deems advisable, including the right to receive for such sale the note or notes of
any such person to whom the sale is made. Any such sale shall provide for payments
adequate to pay the principal of and interest and premiums, if any, on the bonds or notes
issued to finance such project or portion thereof. Any such sale may provide for the
construction of the project by the purchaser of the project;
(15) To make, purchase, or participate in the purchase of loans to finance the
development and marketing of:
(a) Means of energy production utilizing energy sources other than fossil [or nuclear]
fuel, including, but not limited to, wind, water, solar, biomass, solid waste, and other
renewable energy resource technologies;
(b) Fossil fuels and recycled fossil fuels which are indigenous energy resources
produced in the state of Missouri, including coal, heavy oil, and tar sands; and

HCS HB 2807 3
(c) Synthetic fuels produced in the state of Missouri;
(16) To insure any loan, the funds of which are to be used for the development and
marketing of energy resources as authorized by sections 260.005 to 260.125;
(17) To make temporary loans, with or without interest, but with such security for
repayment as the authority deems reasonably necessary and practicable, to defray
development costs of energy resource development projects;
(18) To collect reasonable fees and charges in connection with making and servicing
its loans, notes, bonds and obligations, commitments, and other evidences of indebtedness
made, issued or entered into to develop energy resources, and in connection with providing
technical, consultative, and project assistance services in the area of energy development.
Such fees and charges shall be limited to the amounts required to pay the costs of the
authority, including operating and administrative expenses, and reasonable allowance for
losses which may be incurred;
(19) To enter into agreements or other transactions with any federal or state agency,
any person and any domestic or foreign partnership, corporation, association, or organization
to carry out the provisions of sections 260.005 to 260.125;
(20) To sell, at public or private sale, any mortgage and any real or personal property
subject to that mortgage, negotiable instrument, or obligation securing any loan;
(21) To procure insurance against any loss in connection with its property in such
amounts, and from such insurers, as may be necessary or desirable;
(22) To consent to the modification of the rate of interest, time of payment for any
installment of principal or interest, or any other terms, of any loan, loan commitment,
temporary loan, contract, or agreement made directly by the authority;
(23) To make and publish rules and regulations concerning its lending, insurance of
loans, and temporary lending to defray development costs, along with such other rules and
regulations as are necessary to effectuate its purposes. No rule or portion of a rule
promulgated under the authority of sections 260.005 to 260.125 shall become effective unless
it has been promulgated pursuant to the provisions of section 536.024;
(24) To borrow money to carry out and effectuate its purpose in the area of energy
resource development and to issue its negotiable bonds or notes as evidence of any such
borrowing in such principal amounts and upon such terms as shall be determined by the
authority, and to secure such bonds or notes by the pledge of revenues, mortgages, or notes of
others as authorized by sections 260.005 to 260.125.
2. The authority shall develop a hazardous waste facility if the study required in
section 260.037 demonstrates that a facility is economically feasible. The facility, which shall
not include a hazardous waste landfill, may be operated by any eligible party as specified in
this section. The authority shall begin development of the facility by July 1, 1985.

HCS HB 2807 4
3. All employees of the authority shall be eligible for membership in the Missouri
state employees' retirement system, subject to all provisions in chapters 104 and 105
applicable to the system.
393.1025. As used in sections 393.1020 to 393.1030, the following terms mean:
(1) "Battery energy storage systems", battery energy electrochemical devices
that charge, or collect, energy from the grid or a generation facility, store that energy,
and then discharge that energy at a later time to provide electricity or other grid
services;
(2) "Commission", the public service commission;
[(2)] (3) "Department", the department of [economic development] natural
resources;
[(3)] (4) "Electric utility", any electrical corporation as defined by section 386.020;
(5) "Nuclear energy credit" or "NEC", a tradeable certificate of proof that one
megawatt-hour of electricity has been generated from nuclear power generated from a
nuclear generating facility that begins operation after August 28, 2026;
[(4)] (6) "Renewable energy credit" or "REC", a tradeable certificate of proof that one
megawatt-hour of electricity has been generated from renewable energy sources; [and
(5)] (7) "Renewable energy resources", electric energy produced from wind, solar
thermal sources, photovoltaic cells and panels, dedicated crops grown for energy production,
cellulosic agricultural residues, plant residues, methane from landfills, from agricultural
operations, or from wastewater treatment, thermal depolymerization or pyrolysis for
converting waste material to energy, clean and untreated wood such as pallets, hydropower
(not including pumped storage) that does not require a new diversion or impoundment of
water and that has a nameplate rating of ten megawatts or less, fuel cells using hydrogen
produced by one of the above-named renewable energy sources, battery energy storage
systems, and other sources of energy not including nuclear that become available after
November 4, 2008, and are certified as renewable by rule by the department.
393.1030. 1. The commission shall, in consultation with the department, prescribe by
rule a portfolio requirement for all electric utilities to generate or purchase electricity
generated from renewable energy resources and nuclear energy sources generated from
nuclear generating facilities that begin operation after August 28, 2026. Such portfolio
requirement shall provide that electricity from renewable energy resources and nuclear
energy sources under this subsection shall constitute the following portions of each electric
utility's sales:
(1) No less than two percent for calendar years 2011 through 2013;
(2) No less than five percent for calendar years 2014 through 2017;
(3) No less than ten percent for calendar years 2018 through 2020; and

HCS HB 2807 5
(4) No less than fifteen percent [in each] for calendar [year beginning in] years 2021
through 2026; and
(5) No less than seven and one-half percent in each calendar year beginning in
2027.

At least two percent of each portfolio requirement shall be derived from solar energy. The
portfolio requirements shall apply to all power sold to Missouri consumers whether such
power is self-generated or purchased from another source in or outside of this state. A utility
may comply with the standard in whole or in part by purchasing RECs or NECs. Each
kilowatt-hour of eligible energy generated in Missouri shall count as 1.25 kilowatt-hours for
purposes of compliance.
2. (1) This subsection applies to electric utilities with more than two hundred fifty
thousand but less than one million retail customers in Missouri as of the end of the calendar
year 2024.
(2) Energy meeting the criteria of the renewable energy portfolio requirements set
forth in subsection 1 of this section that is generated from renewable energy resources and
nuclear energy sources pursuant to subsection 1 of this section and contracted for by an
accelerated renewable buyer shall:
(a) Have all associated renewable energy certificates and nuclear energy certificates
retired by the accelerated renewable buyer, or on their behalf, and the certificates shall not be
used to meet the electric utility's portfolio requirements pursuant to subsection 1 of this
section;
(b) Be excluded from the total electric utility's sales used to determine the portfolio
requirements pursuant to subsection 1 of this section; and
(c) Be used to offset all or a portion of its electric load for purposes of determining
compliance with the portfolio requirements pursuant to subsection 1 of this section.
(3) The accelerated renewable buyer shall be exempt from any renewable energy
standard compliance costs as may be established by the utility and approved by the
commission, based on the amount of renewable energy certificates and nuclear energy
certificates retired pursuant to this subsection in proportion to the accelerated renewable
buyer's total electric energy consumption, on an annual basis.
(4) An "accelerated renewable buyer" means a customer of an electric utility, with an
aggregate load over eighty average megawatts, that enters into a contract or contracts to
obtain:
(a) Renewable energy certificates or nuclear energy certificates from renewable
energy resources as defined in section 393.1025, and nuclear energy sources under
subsection 1 of this section; or

HCS HB 2807 6
(b) Energy and renewable energy certificates from solar or wind generation resources
located within the Southwest Power Pool region and initially placed in commercial operation
after January 1, 2020, including any contract with the electric utility for such generation
resources that does not allocate to or recover from any other customer of the utility the cost of
such resources.
(5) Each electric utility shall certify, and verify as necessary, to the commission that
the accelerated renewable buyer has satisfied the exemption requirements of this subsection
for each year, or an accelerated renewable buyer may choose to certify satisfaction of this
exemption by reporting to the commission individually.
(6) The commission may promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary
to implement the provisions of this subsection. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536
and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any
of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then
the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2025,
shall be invalid and void.
(7) Nothing in this section shall be construed as imposing or authorizing the
imposition of any reporting, regulatory, or financial burden on an accelerated renewable
buyer.
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, an electric
utility may comply with this section using energy savings captured due to energy
efficiency or demand-side measures. As part of the commission's rulemaking authority
pursuant to subsection 8 of this section, the commission shall prescribe a rule allowing
an electric utility to comply with the portfolio requirements of subsection 1 of this
section using verified megawatt-hour savings captured due to commission-approved
demand-side programs under section 393.1075 during each compliance year, whether
such annual energy savings is due to measures installed in that compliance year or in
previous compliance years beginning with 2022.
4. The commission, in consultation with the department and within one year of
November 4, 2008, shall select a program for tracking and verifying the trading of renewable
energy credits and nuclear energy credits. An unused credit may exist for up to three years
from the date of its creation. A credit may be used only once to comply with sections
393.1020 to 393.1030 and may not also be used to satisfy any similar nonfederal requirement.
An electric utility may not use a credit derived from a green pricing program. Certificates
from net-metered sources shall initially be owned by the customer-generator. The

HCS HB 2807 7
commission, except where the department is specified, shall make whatever rules are
necessary to enforce the renewable energy standard. Such rules shall include:
(1) A maximum average retail rate increase of one percent determined by estimating
and comparing the electric utility's cost of compliance with least-cost renewable generation
and the cost of continuing to generate or purchase electricity from entirely nonrenewable
sources, taking into proper account future environmental regulatory risk including the risk of
greenhouse gas regulation. Notwithstanding the foregoing, until June 30, 2020, if the
maximum average retail rate increase would be less than or equal to one percent if an electric
utility's investment in solar-related projects initiated, owned or operated by the electric utility
is ignored for purposes of calculating the increase, then additional solar rebates shall be paid
and included in rates in an amount up to the amount that would produce a retail rate increase
equal to the difference between a one percent retail rate increase and the retail rate increase
calculated when ignoring an electric utility's investment in solar-related projects initiated,
owned, or operated by the electric utility. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in
this section, even if the payment of additional solar rebates will produce a maximum average
100 retail rate increase of greater than one percent when an electric utility's investment in solar-
101 related projects initiated, owned or operated by the electric utility are included in the
102 calculation, the additional solar rebate costs shall be included in the prudently incurred costs
103 to be recovered as contemplated by subdivision (4) of this subsection;
104 (2) Penalties of at least twice the average market value of renewable energy credits
105 for the compliance period for failure to meet the targets of subsection 1 of this section. An
106 electric utility will be excused if it proves to the commission that failure was due to events
107 beyond its reasonable control that could not have been reasonably mitigated, or that the
108 maximum average retail rate increase has been reached. Penalties shall not be recovered from
109 customers. Amounts forfeited under this section shall be remitted to the department to
110 purchase renewable energy credits needed for compliance. Any excess forfeited revenues
111 shall be used by the division of energy solely for renewable energy and energy efficiency
112 projects;
113 (3) Provisions for an annual report to be filed by each electric utility in a format
114 sufficient to document its progress in meeting the targets;
115 (4) Provision for recovery outside the context of a regular rate case of prudently
116 incurred costs and the pass-through of benefits to customers of any savings achieved by an
117 electrical corporation in meeting the requirements of this section.
118 [4.] 5. As provided for in this section, except for those electrical corporations that
119 qualify for an exemption under section 393.1050, each electric utility shall make available to
120 its retail customers a solar rebate for new or expanded solar electric systems sited on
121 customers' premises, up to a maximum of twenty-five kilowatts per system, measured in

HCS HB 2807 8
122 direct current that were confirmed by the electric utility to have become operational in
123 compliance with the provisions of section 386.890. The solar rebates shall be two dollars per
124 watt for systems becoming operational on or before June 30, 2014; one dollar and fifty cents
125 per watt for systems becoming operational between July 1, 2014, and June 30, 2015; one
126 dollar per watt for systems becoming operational between July 1, 2015, and June 30, 2016;
127 fifty cents per watt for systems becoming operational between July 1, 2016, and June 30,
128 2017; fifty cents per watt for systems becoming operational between July 1, 2017, and June
129 30, 2019; twenty-five cents per watt for systems becoming operational between July 1, 2019,
130 and June 30, 2020; and zero cents per watt for systems becoming operational after June 30,
131 2020. An electric utility may, through its tariffs, require applications for rebates to be
132 submitted up to one hundred eighty-two days prior to the June thirtieth operational date.
133 Nothing in this section shall prevent an electrical corporation from offering rebates after July
134 1, 2020, through an approved tariff. If the electric utility determines the maximum average
135 retail rate increase provided for in subdivision (1) of subsection 3 of this section will be
136 reached in any calendar year, the electric utility shall be entitled to cease paying rebates to the
137 extent necessary to avoid exceeding the maximum average retail rate increase if the electrical
138 corporation files with the commission to suspend its rebate tariff for the remainder of that
139 calendar year at least sixty days prior to the change taking effect. The filing with the
140 commission to suspend the electrical corporation's rebate tariff shall include the calculation
141 reflecting that the maximum average retail rate increase will be reached and supporting
142 documentation reflecting that the maximum average retail rate increase will be reached. The
143 commission shall rule on the suspension filing within sixty days of the date it is filed. If the
144 commission determines that the maximum average retail rate increase will be reached, the
145 commission shall approve the tariff suspension. The electric utility shall continue to process
146 and pay applicable solar rebates until a final commission ruling; however, if the continued
147 payment causes the electric utility to pay rebates that cause it to exceed the maximum average
148 retail rate increase, the expenditures shall be considered prudently incurred costs as
149 contemplated by subdivision (4) of subsection 3 of this section and shall be recoverable as
150 such by the electric utility. As a condition of receiving a rebate, customers shall transfer to
151 the electric utility all right, title, and interest in and to the renewable energy credits associated
152 with the new or expanded solar electric system that qualified the customer for the solar rebate
153 for a period of ten years from the date the electric utility confirmed that the solar electric
154 system was installed and operational.
155 [5.] 6. The department shall, in consultation with the commission, establish by rule a
156 certification process for electricity generated from renewable resources and used to fulfill the
157 requirements of subsection 1 of this section. Certification criteria for renewable energy
158 generation shall be determined by factors that include fuel type, technology, and the

HCS HB 2807 9
159 environmental impacts of the generating facility. Renewable energy facilities shall not cause
160 undue adverse air, water, or land use impacts, including impacts associated with the gathering
161 of generation feedstocks. If any amount of fossil fuel is used with renewable energy
162 resources, only the portion of electrical output attributable to renewable energy resources
163 shall be used to fulfill the portfolio requirements.
164 [6.] 7. In carrying out the provisions of this section, the commission and the
165 department shall include methane generated from the anaerobic digestion of farm animal
166 waste and thermal depolymerization or pyrolysis for converting waste material to energy as
167 renewable energy resources for purposes of this section.
168 [7.] 8. The commission shall have the authority to promulgate rules for the
169 implementation of this section, but only to the extent such rules are consistent with, and do
170 not delay the implementation of, the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule,
171 as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this
172 section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
173 chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
174 nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
175 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
176 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
177 adopted after August 28, 2013, shall be invalid and void.
393.1050. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any electrical corporation as
defined by subdivision (15) of section 386.020 which, by [January 20, 2009,] January 1,
2027, achieves an amount of eligible renewable energy technology nameplate capacity and
capacity generated from nuclear energy sources pursuant to subsection 1 of section
393.1030 equal to or greater than [fifteen] seven and one-half percent of such corporation's
total owned fossil-fired generating capacity, shall be exempt thereafter from a requirement to
pay any installation subsidy, fee, or rebate to its customers that install their own solar electric
energy system and shall be exempt from meeting any mandated solar renewable energy
standard requirements. Any disputes or denial of exemptions under this section may be
reviewable by the circuit court of Cole County as prescribed by law.
✔